Utah statutes.
31A-9-301.   Securities regulation.

Section 31A-5-301 applies to fraternal bonds but does not apply to contribution notes, as they are defined in Section 31A-5-305, as incorporated by Section 31A-9-303.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

